Tables/Contraction/de-kurzschrift-1998.ctb
always augen 16-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
midendword austausch 16-234-2345-16-156 shouldn't use the st-contraction
always beilstein 12-146-123-23456-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
word bein 12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
word beine 12-1246-15 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
word beinen 12-1246-14 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
word beines 12-1246-123456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always bauform 12-16-124-26-134 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always beteuer 23-2345-126-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always beute 12-126-236 should use the eu-contraction
always beutel 12-126-2345-13456 should use the eu-contraction
always bssy 12-234-234-6-13456 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always bundes 12-256-145-123456 shouldn't use the und-contraction
prfword chemikalie 1456-12356-24-13-25-24-15
always donnerstag 145-135-1345-1345-12456-234-2345-1-1245 shouldn't use the st-contraction
before g always samstag =
endword stag = shouldn't use the st-contraction
endword stage 234-2345-1-12346
endword stages 234-2345-1-1245-123456
sufword eheinstitut 15-125-15-35-23456-24-2345-136-2345
begword eheleu 15-125-15-123-126
before g begword eherin 15-125-15-1235-35 Ehering(e) shouldn't use the er-contraction
midword ehilfs = Analysehilfsmittel shouldn't use the eh-contraction
always einter 15-35-2345-12456 shouldn't use the ein-contraction
midendword emethod = Analysemethode shouldn't use the eh-contraction
midendword enorm 15-1345-26-134 Aussprachenorm shouldn't use the en-contraction 
always emuskel 15-134-136-234-13-13456 shouldn't use the em-contraction
always eschatolog 123456-1456-1-2345-135-123-135-1245 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always esther 123456-2345-125-12456 shouldn't use the st-contraction
always ästhe 345-234-2345-125-15 ästhetisch
midendword erecht 15-1235-2345
midendword ericht 15-2-3456
always erepublik 15-1235-13
midendword emann 15-134-1345
midendword emädchen 15-134-345-145-1456-14
midendword emaedchen 15-134-345-145-1456-14
midendword emänn 15-5-134-1345
midendword emaenn 15-5-134-1345
midendword estand 15-2-23456
midword estell 15-2-13456
always found 124-135-256-145 Foundation shouldn't use the und-contraction
begword gänse =
word gänsen 1245-345-1345-234-14
sufword gänserich 1245-345-1345-234-12456-3456
always geben 12346-12-14
always gebunden 12346-12-256-145-14 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always geier 1245-146-12456 should use the ei-contraction
always geil 1245-146-123 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
midendword geingang 1245-1246-1245-235-1245
midendword geingän 1245-1246-1245-345-1345
always gelungen 12346-123-256-1245-14
always generat 1245-14-12456-1-2345
always generier 1245-14-12456-346-1235
always gerät 12346-1235-345-2345 should use the ge-contraction
always geraet 12346-1235-345-2345 should use the ge-contraction
always geräusch 12346-1235-34-156 should use the ge-contraction
always geraeusch 12346-1235-34-156 should use the ge-contraction
always gerecht 12346-1235-2345
always gericht 12346-2-3456
begword german 1245-12456-134-235 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always gewiesen 12346-2456-346-234-14 shouldn't use the wie-contraction
prfword hallen 125-1-12345-14 shouldn't use the allen-contraction
always hauf 125-16-124 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always hotel 125-135-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always installer 35-23456-1-12345-12456 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
always internet 35-2345-12456-1345-15-2345 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always interview 35-2345-12456-1236-24-15-2456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
after st always ionstrieb 245-234-2345-1235-346-12
after st always ionstrupp 245-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always jubel 245-136-12-13456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always kaffee =
endword kaffees 13-1-124-124-15-123456
always komponist 13-135-134-1234-135-1345-24-23456 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always leselamp 123-123456-15-123-1-134-1234 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always liechtenstein 123-346-1456-2345-14-23456-1246 shouldn't use the te-contraction
prfword linie 123-35-24-15 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always richtlini 2-3456-123-35-24
prfword materie 134-1-2345-12456-24-15 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always metallen 134-15-2345-1-12345-14 shouldn't use the allen-contraction
always regel 1235-15-1245-13456
always release = shouldn't use the el-contraction
always roboter 1235-135-12-135-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always round 1235-135-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
sufword rund 1235-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
word räson = shouldn't use the so-contraction
always döschen 145-246-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always füsschen 124-1256-2346-1456-14
always häschen 125-345-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always höschen 125-246-234-1456-14 should use the ch-contraction
always wollhöschen 2456-135-12345-125-246-234-1456-14 shouldn't use the woll-contraction
always küsschen 13-1256-2346-1456-14 shouldn't use the sch-contraction
always möschen 134-246-234-1456-14 should use the ch-contraction
word röschen 1235-246-234-1456-14 should use the ch-contraction
begword rosaro = shouldn't use the ar-contraction
midendword sammel 234-1-1346-13456 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
midendword samml 234-1-1346-123 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
endword schef 234-1456-15-124
endword schefin 234-1456-15-124-35
endword schefins 234-1456-15-124-35-234
endword schefinnen 234-1456-15-124-35-1345-14
endword schefs 234-1456-15-124-234
endword eschef 123456-1456-15-124
endword eschefin 123456-1456-15-124-35
endword eschefins 123456-1456-15-124-35-234
endword eschefinnen 123456-1456-15-124-35-1345-14
endword eschefs 123456-1456-15-124-234
always schueler 156-1256-123-12456 should use the ue-symbol
always schwung 156-2456-256-1245 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
always september 234-15-1234-2345-12356-12-12456 should use the em-contraction
always dezember 145-15-1356-12356-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
before s always sichts 234-3456-2345-234 Ansichtssache shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always silber 234-24-123-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always sprung 234-1234-1235-256-1245 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
always ssitz 234-2-24 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always ssonntag =
always sspiel 234-2-346
always ssprach 234-234-1234
always sstand 234-2-23456
midendword stitel 234-2345-24-2345-13456
always studien 23456-136-145-24-14 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always stunde 23456-256-145-15 shouldn't use the und-contraction
always stunden 23456-256-145-14
always esystem 15-234-6-13456-23456-12356 shouldn't use the es-contraction
always sturz 23456-136-1235-1356 Absturzursache shouldn't use the zu-contraction
always tagesstät 2345-1-1245-123456-23456-345-2345 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always tagesstaet 2345-1-1245-123456-23456-345-2345 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always team = shouldn't use the te-contraction
midendword termin 2345-12456-134-35 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always wagen 2456-1-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always weiber 2456-146-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
sufword verbund 36-12-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
midendword verbund 1236-12456-12-256-145 shouldn't use the und-contraction
midword versamm 1236-12456-234-1-1346 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
always viertel 1236-346-1235-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
before g always zeitsta 1356-2345-234-2345-1
begword zion = zionist shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always zugantenn 1356-136-1245-235-2345-14-1345
always zweiseit 1356-2456-146-234-146-2345
always zweistaat 1356-2456-146-23456-2345 shouldn't use the weis-contraction

midendword heitstätig 125-234-2345-345-2345-45 gelegenheitstätigkeit shouldn't use the st-contraction
begmidword admiral 1-145-134-24-1235-25
begmidword astral 1-23456-1235-25
before m sufword atom =
begmidword bifokal 12-24-124-135-13-25
#begmidword brachial 12-1235-56-24-25
begmidword bronchial 12-1235-135-1345-1456-24-25 bronchiallymphknoten shouldn't use the ll-contraction
begword general 1245-14-12456-25
begmidword kolonial 13-135-123-135-1345-24-25
begmidword zentral 1356-14-2345-1235-25 zentrallager
always schall 156-1-12345 schallen shouldn't use the allen-contraction
always herzultra 125-12456-1356-136-123-2345-1235-1 shouldn't use the zu-contraction
always mittagessen 134-24-2345-2345-1-1245-15-2346-14
always snakeskin 234-1345-1-13-15-234-13-35

# countries
always dänemark 145-345-1345-15-134-356-13 shouldn't use the em-contraction
always daenemark 145-345-1345-15-134-356-13 shouldn't use the em-contraction

# names
word angela 235-1245-13456-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angeles 235-1245-13456-123456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelika 235-1245-13456-24-13-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelina 235-1245-13456-35-1 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word angelo 235-1245-13456-135 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always daniel 145-235-24-13456 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always gerlind 1245-12456-123-35-145 should use the er-contraction
always solveig 234-135-123-1235-146-1245 shouldn't use the so-contraction

# TODO:
# 8-Punkte-Plan

# inline contraction of emoji descriptions
cldr de
